Maryland, session 2026, HB0624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–391. RESERVED.
19–392. RESERVED.
PART XIII. CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEES AND PLANS.
19–393.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ANCILLARY MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHOSE PRIMARY DUTIES INCLUDE SUPPORTING INDIVIDUALS WHO
PROVIDE DIRECT PATIENT CARE.
(2) “ANCILLARY MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM” INCLUDES:
(I) A DIETARY WORKER;
(II) A PATIENT CARE TECHNICIAN; AND
(III) ANY OTHER NONLICENSED STAFF ASSISTING WITH PATIENT
CARE.
(C) “CLINICAL STAFFING STAFFING “CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE”
MEANS A COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED BY A HOSPITAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION § 19–394(B) § 19–394(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (C) “CLINICAL STAFFING STAFFING CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN”
MEANS A PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION § 19–394(C) §
19–394(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
19–394.

HOUSE BILL 624 3
(A) THIS PART DOES NOT APPLY TO STATE HOSPITALS.
(B) (1) EACH HOSPITAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL COMPLY
WITH THE STAFFING STANDARDS OF:
(I) THE ACCREDITATION BODY THAT ACCREDITS THE
HOSPITAL; AND
(II) THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID
SERVICES CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION.
(2) A CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS PART SHALL
COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) EACH HOSPITAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL ESTABLISH
AND MAINTAIN A CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE THAT HAS EQUAL
MEMBERSHIP FROM MANAGEMENT AND EMPLOYEES:
(I) IF THE HOSPITAL HAS 150 OR FEWER LICENSED BEDS, HAS
3 MANAGERS AND 2 EMPLOYEES; OR
(II) IF THE HOSPITAL HAS 151 OR MORE LICENSED BEDS, HAS 5
MANAGERS AND 4 EMPLOYEES.
(2) EACH CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS PART SHALL MAY INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
INDIVIDUALS:
(I) A CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT;
(II) A DIETARY AIDE;
(III) AN EMERGENCY ROOM A LICENSED NURSE;
(IV) AN ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE WORKER;
(V) A MEDICAL RESIDENT, IF THE COMMITTEE IS IN A TEACHING
HOSPITAL;
(VI) A STAFF PHYSICIAN WHO IS NOT A HOSPITAL EMPLOYEE OR
ADMINISTRATOR; AND
(VII) A STAFF REGISTERED NURSE WHO IS NOT AN EMERGENCY
ROOM NURSE;

HOUSE BILL 624
(VIII) A NURSE PRACTITIONER; AND
(IX) (VII) A TECHNICIAN; OR
(VIII) AN EMPLOYEE WHOSE DUTIES INCLUDE PATIENT
ADVOCACY.
(3) A CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE A PATIENT ADVOCATE.
(C) (D) (1) THE CHIEF NURSE EXECUTIVE OF EACH HOSPITAL SHALL
PRODUCE A DRAFT CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN AND SUBMIT IT TO THE CLINICAL
STAFFING COMMITTEE OF THE HOSPITAL.
(2) EACH CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP
FINALIZE A CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN THAT MEETS PATIENT NEEDS USING
THE PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (E) WHEN DEVELOPING FINALIZING A CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING
PLAN, THE CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) EXISTING STAFFING LEVELS;
(2) METHODS TO SECURE COVERAGE NEEDS AS NECESSARY;
(3) EXISTING GAPS IN STAFFING AND HOW TO ADDRESS THE GAPS;
(4) INPUT FROM INDIVIDUALS WITH SPECIFIC EXPERTISE IN THE
STAFFING CLASSIFICATIONS;
(4) (5) ANY AVAILABLE EVIDENCE–BASED STAFFING STANDARDS;
AND
(5) (6) (5) A SCHEDULE FOR PERIODIC REVIEW OF THE STAFFING
PLAN;
(6) APPROPRIATE SKILL MIX AND COMPETENCY OF STAFF;
(7) STANDARDS REQUIRED BY:
(I) THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES
CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 624 5
(II) THE ACCREDITATION BODY THAT ACCREDITS THE
HOSPITAL;
(8) THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF PATIENTS OF THE HOSPITAL DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND RELEVANT INFORMATION REGARDING
PATIENT DISCHARGES, POTENTIAL ADMISSIONS, AND TRANSFERS;
(9) THE AVERAGE LEVEL OF ACUITY FOR PATIENTS OF THE HOSPITAL
DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND THE CORRESPONDING LEVEL OF
NURSING CARE REQUIRED; AND
(10) AN ESTIMATE OF THE APPROPRIATE COMBINATION OF SKILL,
EXPERIENCE LEVEL, AND SPECIALTY CERTIFICATION OR TRAINING OF STAFF THAT
IS REQUIRED TO ADEQUATELY PROVIDE CARE TO PATIENTS OF THE HOSPITAL.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH HOSPITAL, THROUGH THE
CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE, SHALL CONDUCT A REVIEW OF THE CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN TO:
(1) EVALUATE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CLINICAL STAFFING
PLAN DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR;
(2) UPDATE THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN TO ENSURE THAT THE
CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN CONTINUES TO BE APPROPRIATE AND EFFECTIVE; AND
(3) DEVELOP A PROCESS FOR RECEIVING, RESOLVING, AND
TRACKING COMPLAINTS RELATED TO THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN.
(F) IN DEVELOPING THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN, THE CLINICAL
STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF PATIENTS ON EACH UNIT ON EACH
SHIFT DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND RELEVANT INFORMATION
REGARDING PATIENT DISCHARGES, POTENTIAL ADMISSIONS, AND TRANSFERS;
(2) THE AVERAGE LEVEL OF ACUITY FOR PATIENTS ON EACH UNIT ON
EACH SHIFT DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND THE
CORRESPONDING LEVEL OF NURSING CARE REQUIRED; AND
(3) AN ESTIMATE OF THE APPROPRIATE COMBINATION OF SKILL,
EXPERIENCE LEVEL, AND SPECIALTY CERTIFICATION OR TRAINING OF STAFF FOR
EACH UNIT ON EACH SHIFT THAT IS REQUIRED TO ADEQUATELY PROVIDE CARE.
19–395.

HOUSE BILL 624
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, EACH
HOSPITAL SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN ADOPTED
FINALIZED UNDER § 19–394 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ASSIGN PERSONNEL TO EACH PATIENT CARE UNIT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE CLINICAL CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN.
(B) A REGISTERED NURSE, A LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE, AN ANCILLARY
MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM, OR AN APPLICABLE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE MAY SUBMIT A COMPLAINT TO THE CLINICAL STAFFING
COMMITTEE REGARDING ANY VARIATION WHERE PERSONNEL ASSIGNMENT IN A
PATIENT CARE UNIT IS NOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ADOPTED CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN.
(C) THE CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL DETERMINE, BY A
MAJORITY VOTE, WHETHER A COMPLAINT HAS BEEN ADEQUATELY RESOLVED.
19–396.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH EACH HOSPITAL SHALL:
(1) POST IN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE AND CONSPICUOUS AREA ON
EACH PATIENT UNIT THE CLINICAL ANNUAL STAFFING PLAN FOR THE UNIT AND THE
ACTUAL DAILY STAFFING FOR EACH SHIFT ON THE UNIT; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT A COPY OF THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN IS
AVAILABLE, ON REQUEST, ON EACH PATIENT UNIT PROVIDE THE CLINICAL STAFFING
PLAN TO STAFF ON REQUEST.
(B) IF A CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN FOR A UNIT IS AMENDED AFTER IT IS
IMPLEMENTED, THE HOSPITAL SHALL POST OR PROVIDE THE AMENDED CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN FOR THE UNIT IN THE MANNER REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION IN A TIMELY MANNER.
19–397.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2030, EACH
HOSPITAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION SUMMARIZING HOW THE HOSPITAL’S
CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE HAS ADDRESSED SAFE HOSPITAL STAFFING

HOUSE BILL 624 7
THROUGH THE HOSPITAL’S CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR.
(B) THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) COMPILE THE REPORTS SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAKE THE COMPILED REPORT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE BY
PUBLISHING THE COMPILATION ON THE MAIN PAGE OF ITS WEBSITE.
THIS PART MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A HOSPITAL TO TAKE
ACTIONS THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND
MEDICAID SERVICES CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION OR THE ACCREDITATION
STANDARDS OF THE ACCREDITATION BODY THAT ACCREDITS THE HOSPITAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That each hospital shall establish
a clinical clinical staffing committee as required under § 19–394 of the Health – General
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before January July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That each clinical staffing
committee hospital shall develop implement a clinical clinical staffing plan as required
under § 19–394 of the Health – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or
before July 1, 2027 2028.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.